Hawaii statutes.
§484-20 Fees and inspection expenses.
(a) Notices of filing pursuant to section 484-8 shall not be issued until the
applicant has paid to the director the proper registration or consultant fees,
and has advanced the inspection expenses set forth in subsection (b). Neither
the registration or consultant fees, nor the advanced inspection expenses shall
be refunded regardless of whether the application for registration is rejected
or approved; provided that the director may return any unused inspection expenses
moneys advanced under this section. The registration fee shall be based upon
the number of lots, parcels, units, or interests to be registered at the
following rates:

(1) Up to 100 lots................................. $100

(2) 101 to 500 lots................................ $200

(3) Over 500....................................... $300.

(b) In addition to the registration and
consultant fees, the applicant shall deposit with the director sufficient sums
to cover inspection expenses established by rules adopted in accordance with
chapter 91.

(c) The director may waive the requirement for
inspection.

(d) The director, from time to time, may raise
the registration fee, consultant fees, and inspection expenses under this
section by rules adopted in accordance with chapter 91. [L 1967, c 223, §20;
HRS §484-20; am L 1972, c 79, §1; am L 1983, c 175, §13; am L 1992, c 132, §18]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next